lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 462 Y 1
SFX 462 0 ුවත් .
SFX 398 Y 1
SFX 398 0 නයක් .
SFX 1418 Y 1
SFX 1418 0 නයකි .
SFX 4456 Y 1
SFX 4456 0 ්දෙනෙක් .
SFX 3533 Y 1
SFX 3533 0 වරයකුගේ .
SFX 1787 Y 1
SFX 1787 0 ේන් .
SFX 3893 Y 1
SFX 3893 0 නාවන් .
SFX 2769 Y 1
SFX 2769 0 ජාතික .
SFX 1212 Y 1
SFX 1212 0 රුන් .
SFX 1966 Y 1
SFX 1966 0 වාක් .
SFX 2846 Y 1
SFX 2846 0 ්සියට .
SFX 3101 Y 1
SFX 3101 0 ිසිය .
SFX 4499 Y 1
SFX 4499 0 ්තාවට .
SFX 39 Y 1
SFX 39 0 වත් .
SFX 3567 Y 1
SFX 3567 0 වතා .
SFX 867 Y 1
SFX 867 0 වති .
SFX 635 Y 1
SFX 635 0 වතී .
SFX 2530 Y 1
SFX 2530 0 වතු .
SFX 2852 Y 1
SFX 2852 0 ්වුවත් .
SFX 2928 Y 1
SFX 2928 0 ්තාවේ .
SFX 2541 Y 1
SFX 2541 0 ලුවක් .
SFX 1259 Y 1
SFX 1259 0 තක .
SFX 505 Y 1
SFX 505 0 තට .
SFX 4010 Y 1
SFX 4010 0 තද .
SFX 2127 Y 1
SFX 2127 0 තන .
SFX 259 Y 1
SFX 259 0 තම .
SFX 533 Y 1
SFX 533 0 තය .
SFX 504 Y 1
SFX 504 0 තර .
SFX 891 Y 1
SFX 891 0 තල .
SFX 4235 Y 1
SFX 4235 0 ්විට .
SFX 1287 Y 1
SFX 1287 0 ්විණ .
SFX 584 Y 1
SFX 584 0 ්විය .
SFX 2961 Y 1
SFX 2961 0 ෝචිත .
SFX 6 Y 1
SFX 6 0 ත් .
SFX 137 Y 1
SFX 137 0 තා .
SFX 206 Y 1
SFX 206 0 ති .
SFX 1101 Y 1
SFX 1101 0 තී .
SFX 400 Y 1
SFX 400 0 තු .
SFX 807 Y 1
SFX 807 0 තෙ .
SFX 305 Y 1
SFX 305 0 තේ .
SFX 1698 Y 1
SFX 1698 0 තෝ .
SFX 1911 Y 1
SFX 1911 0 ළුව .
SFX 3706 Y 1
SFX 3706 0 යවන .
SFX 4991 Y 1
SFX 4991 0 ිස්සුම් .
SFX 4021 Y 1
SFX 4021 0 ණවලින් .
SFX 3653 Y 1
SFX 3653 0 රාගේ .
SFX 1638 Y 1
SFX 1638 0 රීම .
SFX 157 Y 1
SFX 157 0 ලින් .
SFX 3712 Y 1
SFX 3712 0 ‍යයන්ට .
SFX 1143 Y 1
SFX 1143 0 ෙනුයි .
SFX 912 Y 1
SFX 912 0 ෙනුයේ .
SFX 2972 Y 1
SFX 2972 0 ේස් .
SFX 2973 Y 1
SFX 2973 0 ේසා .
SFX 4624 Y 1
SFX 4624 0 ේසි .
SFX 3512 Y 1
SFX 3512 0 වස්තු .
SFX 3507 Y 1
SFX 3507 0 වාදියෙකු .
SFX 3315 Y 1
SFX 3315 0 ාටම .
SFX 3955 Y 1
SFX 3955 0 දර්ශන .
SFX 2656 Y 1
SFX 2656 0 න්නැයි .
SFX 3177 Y 1
SFX 3177 0 ිටත් .
SFX 2077 Y 1
SFX 2077 0 පසින් .
SFX 583 Y 1
SFX 583 0 කමින් .
SFX 4312 Y 1
SFX 4312 0 ්රාජ් .
SFX 4920 Y 1
SFX 4920 0 ීවත් .
SFX 2629 Y 1
SFX 2629 0 බන් .
SFX 4686 Y 1
SFX 4686 0 ෙයාර් .
SFX 4618 Y 1
SFX 4618 0 ොන්නරු .
SFX 1526 Y 1
SFX 1526 0 ිවෙයි .
SFX 4093 Y 1
SFX 4093 0 ගතය .
SFX 602 Y 1
SFX 602 0 යම් .
SFX 813 Y 1
SFX 813 0 ගතව .
SFX 125 Y 1
SFX 125 0 ගත් .
SFX 631 Y 1
SFX 631 0 හිදීය .
SFX 4932 Y 1
SFX 4932 0 ීම්වලින් .
SFX 3717 Y 1
SFX 3717 0 යමේ .
SFX 3162 Y 1
SFX 3162 0 ිතුමා .
SFX 1931 Y 1
SFX 1931 0 සුන් .
SFX 4154 Y 1
SFX 4154 0 කයනුත් .
SFX 3654 Y 1
SFX 3654 0 ‍රා .
SFX 4073 Y 1
SFX 4073 0 ගැන්මෙන් .
SFX 1584 Y 1
SFX 1584 0 වේවා .
SFX 1946 Y 1
SFX 1946 0 වේවි .
SFX 4541 Y 1
SFX 4541 0 ්ගික .
SFX 4635 Y 1
SFX 4635 0 ේරා .
SFX 3906 Y 1
SFX 3906 0 නගන .
SFX 1685 Y 1
SFX 1685 0 නගේ .
SFX 2818 Y 1
SFX 2818 0 කාවෙන් .
SFX 3592 Y 1
SFX 3592 0 ලීමත් .
SFX 2574 Y 1
SFX 2574 0 ‍රයක් .
SFX 879 Y 1
SFX 879 0 පතක් .
SFX 200 Y 1
SFX 200 0 යාගේ .
SFX 3357 Y 1
SFX 3357 0 හරින .
SFX 4479 Y 1
SFX 4479 0 ්ථකත්වය .
SFX 2139 Y 1
SFX 2139 0 ටුවේ .
SFX 984 Y 1
SFX 984 0 තිස්ස .
SFX 855 Y 1
SFX 855 0 හට .
SFX 1857 Y 1
SFX 1857 0 ිනුයි .
SFX 3364 Y 1
SFX 3364 0 හන .
SFX 1178 Y 1
SFX 1178 0 හම .
SFX 1917 Y 1
SFX 1917 0 හය .
SFX 1575 Y 1
SFX 1575 0 හර .
SFX 945 Y 1
SFX 945 0 හල .
SFX 2621 Y 1
SFX 2621 0 භව .
SFX 4628 Y 1
SFX 4628 0 ේශයේ .
SFX 2619 Y 1
SFX 2619 0 මඩු .
SFX 4937 Y 1
SFX 4937 0 ීමෙහිලා .
SFX 416 Y 1
SFX 416 0 කටත් .
SFX 1915 Y 1
SFX 1915 0 හා .
SFX 57 Y 1
SFX 57 0 හි .
SFX 1574 Y 1
SFX 1574 0 හී .
SFX 238 Y 1
SFX 238 0 හු .
SFX 2405 Y 1
SFX 2405 0 හේ .
SFX 883 Y 1
SFX 883 0 නටත් .
SFX 2578 Y 1
SFX 2578 0 රමින් .
SFX 1292 Y 1
SFX 1292 0 ්නෙක් .
SFX 1294 Y 1
SFX 1294 0 ්නෙකි .
SFX 1293 Y 1
SFX 1293 0 ්නෙකු .
SFX 2748 Y 1
SFX 2748 0 තකට .
SFX 3627 Y 1
SFX 3627 0 රෝග .
SFX 2558 Y 1
SFX 2558 0 රෝද .
SFX 4180 Y 1
SFX 4180 0 ්සේනා .
SFX 4727 Y 1
SFX 4727 0 ෙතට .
SFX 2112 Y 1
SFX 2112 0 දීන් .
SFX 927 Y 1
SFX 927 0 ියෙහි .
SFX 799 Y 1
SFX 799 0 යකටත් .
SFX 4926 Y 1
SFX 4926 0 ීයමය .
SFX 747 Y 1
SFX 747 0 තක් .
SFX 1711 Y 1
SFX 1711 0 තකි .
SFX 4011 Y 1
SFX 4011 0 තකු .
SFX 3194 Y 1
SFX 3194 0 ිකරණයේ .
SFX 224 Y 1
SFX 224 0 ෙත් .
SFX 4714 Y 1
SFX 4714 0 ෙනකොට .
SFX 4725 Y 1
SFX 4725 0 ෙතැ .
SFX 492 Y 1
SFX 492 0 ෙති .
SFX 1549 Y 1
SFX 1549 0 ිනවා .
SFX 1498 Y 1
SFX 1498 0 ෙව්වා .
SFX 735 Y 1
SFX 735 0 ම්වලින් .
SFX 2233 Y 1
SFX 2233 0 ෙව්වේ .
SFX 3294 Y 1
SFX 3294 0 ානං .
SFX 1566 Y 1
SFX 1566 0 ානය .
SFX 2182 Y 1
SFX 2182 0 ්වයක් .
SFX 628 Y 1
SFX 628 0 ාන් .
SFX 3290 Y 1
SFX 3290 0 ානා .
SFX 1172 Y 1
SFX 1172 0 ානි .
SFX 846 Y 1
SFX 846 0 ානු .
SFX 1360 Y 1
SFX 1360 0 ානේ .
SFX 4564 Y 1
SFX 4564 0 ්කරුවා .
SFX 2951 Y 1
SFX 2951 0 ්කරුවෝ .
SFX 2648 Y 1
SFX 2648 0 පතියකු .
SFX 2968 Y 1
SFX 2968 0 ොවක් .
SFX 2729 Y 1
SFX 2729 0 තෙල් .
SFX 3809 Y 1
SFX 3809 0 බරය .
SFX 1019 Y 1
SFX 1019 0 ීමක .
SFX 80 Y 1
SFX 80 0 ීමට .
SFX 1152 Y 1
SFX 1152 0 ීමද .
SFX 4104 Y 1
SFX 4104 0 කුඹුරේ .
SFX 657 Y 1
SFX 657 0 ීමය .
SFX 2767 Y 1
SFX 2767 0 ටීම .
SFX 2628 Y 1
SFX 2628 0 බර් .
SFX 272 Y 1
SFX 272 0 ීම් .
SFX 1835 Y 1
SFX 1835 0 ීමි .
SFX 3095 Y 1
SFX 3095 0 ීමු .
SFX 113 Y 1
SFX 113 0 ීමේ .
SFX 3766 Y 1
SFX 3766 0 මාවේ .
SFX 2070 Y 1
SFX 2070 0 පොළට .
SFX 3220 Y 1
SFX 3220 0 ැවිණි .
SFX 1877 Y 1
SFX 1877 0 ැයිද .
SFX 2110 Y 1
SFX 2110 0 දුවක් .
SFX 2506 Y 1
SFX 2506 0 වයයි .
SFX 1659 Y 1
SFX 1659 0 පොළේ .
SFX 146 Y 1
SFX 146 0 යාට .
SFX 4256 Y 1
SFX 4256 0 ්වාදය .
SFX 1221 Y 1
SFX 1221 0 යාද .
SFX 449 Y 1
SFX 449 0 යාම .
SFX 874 Y 1
SFX 874 0 යාය .
SFX 3700 Y 1
SFX 3700 0 යාල .
SFX 4811 Y 1
SFX 4811 0 ුරෙන් .
SFX 275 Y 1
SFX 275 0 හොත් .
SFX 3828 Y 1
SFX 3828 0 පාමින් .
SFX 428 Y 1
SFX 428 0 යාව .
SFX 1753 Y 1
SFX 1753 0 ්වාදී .
SFX 3697 Y 1
SFX 3697 0 යැයිද .
SFX 4455 Y 1
SFX 4455 0 ්දෙන් .
SFX 828 Y 1
SFX 828 0 ්ගත .
SFX 2888 Y 1
SFX 2888 0 ්‍යයන්ට .
SFX 1490 Y 1
SFX 1490 0 ්ගම .
SFX 2946 Y 1
SFX 2946 0 ්ගය .
SFX 2223 Y 1
SFX 2223 0 ්ගල .
SFX 1649 Y 1
SFX 1649 0 ‍යයක් .
SFX 1861 Y 1
SFX 1861 0 ිනම් .
SFX 2944 Y 1
SFX 2944 0 ්ග් .
SFX 4542 Y 1
SFX 4542 0 ්ගා .
SFX 1054 Y 1
SFX 1054 0 වයෙන් .
SFX 2222 Y 1
SFX 2222 0 ්ගෙ .
SFX 489 Y 1
SFX 489 0 ්ගේ .
SFX 2780 Y 1
SFX 2780 0 ගෙත් .
SFX 2033 Y 1
SFX 2033 0 යහොත් .
SFX 4836 Y 1
SFX 4836 0 ුමින් .
SFX 1489 Y 1
SFX 1489 0 ්ගොඩ .
SFX 1070 Y 1
SFX 1070 0 රයෙන් .
SFX 1993 Y 1
SFX 1993 0 ලුවා .
SFX 592 Y 1
SFX 592 0 ාකාර .
SFX 3953 Y 1
SFX 3953 0 දවා .
SFX 1992 Y 1
SFX 1992 0 ලුවේ .
SFX 3875 Y 1
SFX 3875 0 න්ඩ් .
SFX 3876 Y 1
SFX 3876 0 න්ඩෝ .
SFX 4360 Y 1
SFX 4360 0 ්‍යතාවක් .
SFX 4298 Y 1
SFX 4298 0 ්ලත් .
SFX 3242 Y 1
SFX 3242 0 ාසය .
SFX 4387 Y 1
SFX 4387 0 ්මටත් .
SFX 3657 Y 1
SFX 3657 0 ‍රයේ .
SFX 3237 Y 1
SFX 3237 0 ාස් .
SFX 4222 Y 1
SFX 4222 0 ්වුවහොත් .
SFX 3241 Y 1
SFX 3241 0 ාසී .
SFX 1033 Y 1
SFX 1033 0 ිකයා .
SFX 4930 Y 1
SFX 4930 0 ීයකරණයක් .
SFX 2343 Y 1
SFX 2343 0 ිකයි .
SFX 1032 Y 1
SFX 1032 0 ිකයෝ .
SFX 929 Y 1
SFX 929 0 ියම් .
SFX 2361 Y 1
SFX 2361 0 ැකෙන .
SFX 4098 Y 1
SFX 4098 0 ක්කාර .
SFX 2334 Y 1
SFX 2334 0 ිගත් .
SFX 3689 Y 1
SFX 3689 0 යෙකුටම .
SFX 3777 Y 1
SFX 3777 0 මවන .
SFX 2538 Y 1
SFX 2538 0 ල්ලකට .
SFX 1871 Y 1
SFX 1871 0 ිකයකු .
SFX 2051 Y 1
SFX 2051 0 මවා .
SFX 1063 Y 1
SFX 1063 0 ල්ලක් .
SFX 1104 Y 1
SFX 1104 0 ණන් .
SFX 2761 Y 1
SFX 2761 0 ණයෙහි .
SFX 1633 Y 1
SFX 1633 0 ලකට .
SFX 2460 Y 1
SFX 2460 0 වෙදි .
SFX 1969 Y 1
SFX 1969 0 වලිය .
SFX 1543 Y 1
SFX 1543 0 ින්ට .
SFX 3155 Y 1
SFX 3155 0 ින්ඩ .
SFX 376 Y 1
SFX 376 0 ින්ද .
SFX 1028 Y 1
SFX 1028 0 ින්න .
SFX 254 Y 1
SFX 254 0 ින්ම .
SFX 2703 Y 1
SFX 2703 0 ද්‍රව්‍ය .
SFX 916 Y 1
SFX 916 0 ුවීම .
SFX 3091 Y 1
SFX 3091 0 ීයාම .
SFX 727 Y 1
SFX 727 0 ලක් .
SFX 2000 Y 1
SFX 2000 0 ලකි .
SFX 2737 Y 1
SFX 2737 0 තාවත් .
SFX 901 Y 1
SFX 901 0 කත්වය .
SFX 4152 Y 1
SFX 4152 0 කයාත් .
SFX 32 Y 1
SFX 32 0 ෙහි .
SFX 3590 Y 1
SFX 3590 0 ලුම් .
SFX 1251 Y 1
SFX 1251 0 දම් .
SFX 4758 Y 1
SFX 4758 ව ූතියට ව
SFX 3630 Y 1
SFX 3630 ත රුවේ ත
SFX 4861 Y 1
SFX 4861 ා ුන්ගෙන් ා
SFX 4647 Y 1
SFX 4647 ල ේදියකු ල
SFX 3986 Y 1
SFX 3986 ණ තු ණ
SFX 4891 Y 1
SFX 4891 ී ුණහොත් ී
SFX 4878 Y 1
SFX 4878 ි ුතු ි
SFX 2991 Y 1
SFX 2991 ල ෙල ල
SFX 2324 Y 1
SFX 2324 ා ිත්‍ර ා
SFX 1672 Y 1
SFX 1672 ත න්නවා ත
SFX 3485 Y 1
SFX 3485 ය වැනි ය
SFX 4307 Y 1
SFX 4307 ත ්‍රාහකයින් ත
SFX 3656 Y 1
SFX 3656 න රව න
