lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.dic
අරුත්/1931
ඇසි/2,9,33,106,157,158,244,486,1227,1638,1663,1987,2560
ඉල්ල/11,20,33,42,69,71,80,83,103,113,114,144,206,208,209,216,240,241,245,272,287,462,534,586,654,679,704,770,834,974,1017,1018,1019,1152,1809,2272,2278,2706,3061,3062,3063,3321,4771,4833,4932,4954
ඉහත/18,25,122,2151,2928,4499
උක්/2530
කරා/1,8,305,407,456,807,1080,3477,3782
ගැන/2,3,5,6,8,11,12,39,42,102,121,140,147,203,211,216,220,230,263,270,280,287,316,326,360,374,472,478,510,538,584,615,694,704,903,912,930,1124,1286,1287,1323,1467,1468,1469,1476,1477,1480,1752,1828,1854,1956,2195,2196,2317,2846,2849,3062,3073,4215,4229,4231,4387
තනි/10,19,21,52,64,76,86,100,161,213,226,645,1279,1743,1744,3717
දැල්/1584,2643
දූව/926,1212
දෙගුරු/883
ද්වාර/2,13,635
නගර/2,3,5,13,15,19,21,26,27,29,30,38,43,46,48,49,53,60,62,66,123,139,186,226,234,295,460,574,604,663,668,723,732,1039,1223,1232,1808,3243,3297,3421,3492,3706
නැන/4,6,20,59,80,108,584,1010,1466,3068
නිදන්/3512
නොලැබ/3,83,121,140,211,220,230,263,270,310,316,326,374,462,543,1313,1799,1830,2976,3080
නොසිටි/2,33,47,53,82,165,206,240,708,1075,2034,2656
පලා/6,26,171,233,456,505,580,950,1079,1080,2494,2786,3970
පහසු/2,8,10,11,37,39,45,52,54,100,120,133,156,161,189,259,294,309,860,1748,2813,4157
පාන/1,2,5,8,13,19,20,44,48,50,51,55,58,71,114,159,193,229,1690,1911,2919,3589,3864,4495
පාස්/400
පිටු/1235,1405,1947,2077,2627,3808,3834
පිල/1,3,4,5,6,11,17,22,110,118,333,728,756,878,929,1758,2334,4983,4991,4992,4993,4994
පිල්/2541,3767
පිළි/52,56,61,63,90,125,226,329,348,358,426,485,534,535,581,582,602,688,728,752,894,950,1085,1088,1112,1232,1269,1450,1702,1732,2146,2147,2436,2794,2818,2836,3632,3634,3719,3810,4081,4085,4090,4118,4119
පුපුර/11,20,24,33,35,56,106,262,867,2513,4783
පෙර/1,2,6,8,11,12,20,25,42,69,113,144,216,232,251,263,276,367,412,420,425,685,726,750,853,887,1097,1106,1573,1622,2060,2151,2352,2497,2958,2972,2973,2981,3329,3333,3621,3754,3755,3941,4313,4635,4923
පොර/1,3,10,13,16,19,20,35,43,54,79,94,106,248,583,878,1052,1304,2816
පොළ/1,2,3,4,7,10,17,20,22,23,30,32,34,36,39,45,79,153,248,378,401,520,668,1304,2967,2968,4602,4603,4614,4615,4616,4617,4618
ප්‍රකාශ/2,5,13,15,17,19,21,27,30,33,36,38,43,46,48,66,86,87,106,145,156,196,297,302,372,398,437,453,483,487,565,609,614,810,933,999,1245,1274,1276,1277,1414,1415,1417,1418,1551,1583,1872,2161,2685,2761,2833,3729,3903,4141
බහු/1722,2106,2477,2504,2769
බැරි/2,8,10,12,76,100,131,133,149,161,212,217,343,446,504,509,522,571,583,1078,1706,2260,3381,3450,4158
බින්/206,2110,2791
බුලත/1,3,5,18,99,110,801,1755,4235
මතක/2,5,11,12,13,15,19,21,910,1287,2172,4568
මධ්‍ය/2,8,15,17,19,21,66,90,318,949,1081,1180,2127,3380,3857
මායාව/4,23,89,537,610,1101
මාරු/533,1430
මාල/2,3,9,13,15,16,20,24,38,52,127,193,231,255,262,346,363,397,419,442,443,463,520,550,627,713,1169,1730,1787,1859,1884,2160,2365,3156,3203
මෙල්/56,664,2629
යනව/194,3177
යුතු/2,8,10,11,12,24,35,36,37,64,100,101,133,149,156,161,176,189,309,392,466,718,1297,1463,1483,1748,1966,2065,2066,2213,2933,3697,4483,4512
ලිපි/2,13,15,19,21,26,30,33,38,46,48,60,70,139,166,196,236,239,250,260,330,398,453,483,507,609,741,1094,2844
වර්ගය/3315
වසා/63,125
විදේශ/26,29,30,38,51,90,114,141,186,239,813,1173
ශිව/5,559,1640,1906,4312
සතු/1,2,9,10,11,31,41,52,72,76,86,89,91,131,145,150,189,190,244,392,395,396,410,422,482,750,1106,1213,1635,3628,3640,3653,3671,3672,4036
සමාජ/2,5,13,15,19,21,26,27,29,30,38,43,53,60,66,70,90,101,114,123,128,139,170,186,226,258,295,320,368,380,427,479,526,675,716,794,873,948,954,963,1216,1378,1599,1753,2487,2582,2590,3507,3687,3688
සැලකිල්ල/1,4,6,7,23,1143
සැළක/51,80,83,102,114,623,912,3096,4747
සියෝල්/631
සුරංග/16,160,346,3893
සේවාව/1,3,4,7,9,17,22,23,41,56,134,148,157,394,1211
සොයා/449,1219,1725,4073
ස්ථාන/2,6,13,15,19,21,26,27,29,30,38,43,46,48,51,53,60,62,66,67,70,90,114,123,139,141,185,186,195,250,295,318,368,383,723,963,1039,1223,2598,2961,3296,3297,3839
ස්වරූප/13,15,19,21,43,48,60,137,199,798
ස්විට්සර්ලන්තය/3,6,2978
හැඩ/1,2,11,13,15,19,21,27,38,42,47,48,76,94,260,549,728,891,1727,2157,2794,3488,3632,3633,4072
හිතාගන්න/39
